Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Chapter 1. Soil Conservation Districts Law.

§§ 21-1 through 21-112.21.

Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

As to soil and water conservation, see now § 10.1-500 et seq.

As to flood protection and dam safety, see § 10.1-600 et seq. As to erosion and sediment control, see §

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1988, cc. 763 and 780 added a new § 21-65.1, which has been incorporated into new Title 10.1 as § 10.1-501.1. Repealed § 21-89.3 was amended by Acts 1988, cc. 690 and 732, which amendments have been incorporated into § 10.1-560. Repealed §§ 21-89.4, 21-89.5 and 21-89.6 were amended by Acts 1988, c. 732, which amendments have been incorporated into §§ 10.1-561 to 10.1-564. Repealed §§ 21-89.7, 21-89.8 and 21-89.11 were amended by Acts 1988, c. 694, which amendments were incorporated into §§ 10.1-565, 10.1-566 and 10.1-569. Repealed § 21-89.15 was also repealed by Acts 1988, c. 732.